Colorado, session 2026A, HB1066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-113.5, amend
(1)(a.5), (1)(b), (1)(b.5), (1)(c)(II) introductory portion, (1)(d), (2)(a),
(2)(c)(II)(B), and (2)(c)(II)(C) as follows:
39-3-113.5. Property acquired by nonprofit housing provider
for low-income housing - use for charitable purposes - exemption -
limitations - definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a.5) "Community land trust" means a nonprofit organization that
is exempt from taxation under section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal
Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and is designed to ensure long-term
housing affordability through a shared-equity model by acquiring and
maintaining ownership of real property, while selling OR RENTING the
improvements to low-to-middle income households for use as a primary
residence.
(b) "Indicators of intent" means off-site activities of a nonprofit
housing provider that establish the provider's specific intent to:
(I) Use property for the purpose of constructing or rehabilitating
housing to be sold OR RENTED to low-income applicants; or
(II) Sell OR RENT the property to low-income applicants for the
purpose of constructing or rehabilitating housing for the low-income
applicants.
(b.5) "Land lease" means a long-term lease used in affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL properties to lease the real property that is
owned by a community land trust or nonprofit affordable homeownership
OR RENTAL developer to the owner of the improvements on the real
-2- HB26-1066

property and preserve the improvements as an affordable homeownership
OR RENTAL property.
(c) "Low-income applicant" means:
(II) For property tax years commencing on or after January 1,
2024, an individual or family who both apply to a nonprofit housing
provider to purchase OR RENT an affordable for-sale unit and whose total
income is at or below either:
(d) "Nonprofit housing provider" means an organization that is
exempt from federal income tax pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the
federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and that has a
primary organizational mission of THAT INCLUDES:
(I) Working with low-income applicants to construct or
rehabilitate housing that the organization then sells OR RENTS to the
low-income applicants for their residential use; or
(II) Selling OR RENTING property or improvements to low-income
applicants for the low-income applicants' residential use.
(2) (a) Subject to the limitations specified in subsection (3) of this
section, for property tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2011,
real property acquired by a nonprofit housing provider upon which the
provider intends to construct or rehabilitate housing to be sold OR RENTED
to low-income applicants or which the provider intends to sell OR RENT
to low-income applicants for their residential use is deemed to be being
used for strictly charitable purposes, regardless of whether or not there is
actual physical use of the property, and shall be exempt from property
taxation in accordance with section 5 of article X of the state constitution.
(c) (II) For property tax years commencing on or after January 1,
2024, in determining whether a nonprofit housing provider satisfies the
-3- HB26-1066

intent requirement of subsection (2)(a) of this section with respect to
particular property, the administrator may consider indicators of intent,
including but not limited to:
(B) A resolution by the nonprofit housing provider's board that
designates the property for construction or rehabilitation of for-sale OR
RENTAL affordable housing; or
(C) A resolution by the nonprofit housing provider's board that
approves the purchase of the property for land banking with the purpose
of constructing or rehabilitating for-sale OR RENTAL affordable housing.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-127.7, amend
(1), (2)(a), (2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(e), (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(III), (3)(b), (4), (6), (7)(a)
introductory portion, and (7)(b) as follows:
39-3-127.7. Community land trust property - nonprofit
affordable homeownership or rental developer property - exemption
- requirements - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) (a) The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(I) The cost of homeownership AND HOME RENTAL has risen
dramatically in Colorado: From December 2020 to December 2022, the
median home value in Colorado increased over thirty percent; AND
(II) Entry-level homeownership options AND AFFORDABLE
RENTALS are increasingly unavailable, and community land trusts and
nonprofit affordable homeownership HOUSING developers are playing an
increasingly large role in helping low- and middle-income Coloradans
access homeownership AND AFFORDABLE HOMES FOR RENT; and.
(III) Compared to tools used to incentivize affordable rental
housing, such as the low-income housing tax credit, there are fewer tools
to incentivize the creation of affordable for-sale housing.
-4- HB26-1066

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to provide
a limited property tax exemption to community land trusts and nonprofit
affordable homeownership HOUSING developers in certain circumstances.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Affordable homeownership OR RENTAL property" means any
dwelling that:
(I) Is restricted by a deed that impacts ownership of the property,
limits the property's resale price, requires a long-term land lease with a
community land trust or nonprofit affordable homeownership OR RENTAL
developer, or imposes any other restriction that limits the property such
that it may only be purchased OR RENTED by designated households, a
community land trust, or a nonprofit affordable homeownership OR
RENTAL developer;
(II) Is sold OR RENTED to a household that at the time of purchase
OR RENTAL is at or below one hundred percent of the area median income
of households of that same size in the county in which the housing is
located; and
(III) Is sold OR RENTED to a purchaser OR LESSEE to be used as a
primary residence.
(c) "Improvement" means a permanent change to real property
that augments the real property's value including but not limited to a
single-family home, townhome, or condominium, OR RENTAL PROPERTY.
(d) "Land lease" means a long-term lease used in affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL properties to lease the real property that is
owned by a community land trust or nonprofit affordable homeownership
developer to the owner of the improvements on the real property and
preserve the improvements as an affordable homeownership OR RENTAL
-5- HB26-1066

property.
(e) "Nonprofit affordable homeownership OR RENTAL developer"
means an organization that is exempt from federal income tax pursuant
to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as
amended, and that has a primary organizational mission of THAT
INCLUDES providing for-sale OR FOR RENT affordable housing units to
low-to-middle income households for use as a primary residence.
(3) (a) For property tax years commencing on or after January 1,
2024, real property is deemed to be used for a strictly charitable purpose,
and is exempt from property taxation in accordance with section 5 of
article X of the state constitution, if the real property:
(I) Is held by either a community land trust or a nonprofit
affordable homeownership OR RENTAL developer;
(III) Is leased to the owner of the improvements as an affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL property.
(b) The real property described in subsection (3)(a) of this section
is deemed to be used for a strictly charitable purpose, and is exempt from
property taxation in accordance with section 5 of article X of the state
constitution, until the real property is no longer used as an affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL property.
(4) If a community land trust or nonprofit affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL developer claims a property tax exemption
pursuant to this section for a real property and then subsequently sells,
donates, or leases that real property so that the real property no longer
qualifies as an affordable homeownership OR RENTAL property, the
community land trust or nonprofit affordable homeownership OR RENTAL
developer is liable for all property taxes for the real property for the
-6- HB26-1066

property tax years when the real property did not qualify as an affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL property and during which the community
land trust or nonprofit affordable homeownership OR RENTAL developer
did not pay property taxes for the real property due to the property tax
exemption described in this section.
(6) A community land trust or nonprofit affordable home
ownership OR RENTAL developer that owns real property that qualifies for
the property tax exemption described in this section shall submit the land
lease for each real property that qualifies for the property tax exemption
described in this section to the appropriate county assessor within
twenty-five days of the initial execution of the land lease.
(7) (a) Any community land trust or nonprofit affordable
homeownership OR RENTAL developer that claims a property tax
exemption pursuant to this section shall comply with the provisions of
section 39-2-117; except that, if the real property that is allowed an
exemption pursuant to this section has been subdivided, the owner of such
property or the owner's agent is only required to:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (7)(a)(II) of this section, if the real
property that is allowed an exemption pursuant to this section has been
subdivided but the subdivided parcel has been split into a separate taxable
parcel from the improvements and is leased to the owner of the
improvements as an affordable homeownership OR RENTAL property, then
the owner of such real property or the owner's agent must file an
individual annual report for the subdivided parcel in accordance with
section 39-2-117 (3)(a).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
-7- HB26-1066

pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this
act or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period
after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
-8- HB26-1066